Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 5. Water Divisions and Superintendents

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

§ 41-3-501.
Water divisions defined.

The state of Wyoming is hereby divided into four (4) water divisions, as follows:

Water Division No. 1 shall consist of all lands within this state, drained by the North Platte River, and the tributaries of the North Platte River and the South Platte River, Snake River, (a tributary of Green River) and its tributaries, and Running Water Creek and its tributaries;

Water Division No. 2 shall consist of all lands within this state, drained by the tributaries of the Yellowstone and Missouri Rivers north of the water shed of the North Platte River and Running Water Creek, and east of the summit of the Big Horn Mountains;

Water Division No. 3 shall consist of all lands within this state drained by the Big Horn River and its tributaries, and by Clark’s Fork and its tributaries;

Water Division No. 4 shall consist of all lands within this state drained by the Green, Bear and Snake Rivers, and the tributaries thereof; except Snake River, (a tributary of Green River), and its tributaries.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, §§ 1-5; 1895, ch. 62, §§ 1-3; R.S. 1899, § 848; C.S. 1910, § 753; C.S. 1920, § 874; R.S. 1931, § 122-201; C.S. 1945, § 71-101; W.S. 1957, § 41-54.

History of section. —

The basic law concerning the regulation and control of water rights was Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, which repealed the bulk of the previously existing laws on the subject. As amended and supplemented, Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, appears in this compilation as §§

9-1-902

,

41-3-501

through

41-3-504

,

41-3-506

through

41-3-602

,

41-3-604

through

41-3-609

,

41-3-611

,

41-3-613

through

41-3-615

,

41-4-101

,

41-4-201

,

41-4-206

,

41-4-301

through

41-4-309

,

41-4-312

through

41-4-314

,

41-4-316

,

41-4-317

,

41-4-325

,

41-4-401

through

41-4-512

and

41-4-517

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Powers and duties of water commissioners. —

Water commissioners are not vested with arbitrary control; instead, they are required to see that water is divided among the several appropriators in strict accordance with adjudicated or determined rights. Mitchell Irr. Dist. v. Sharp, 121 F.2d 964, 1941 U.S. App. LEXIS 3370 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 314 U.S. 667, 62 S. Ct. 129, 86 L. Ed. 534, 1941 U.S. LEXIS 241 (U.S. 1941).

Division superintendents and water commissioners are charged exclusively with administrative duties in superintending diversion and distribution of water in strict conformity with adjudicated or determined priorities. Mitchell Irr. Dist. v. Sharp, 121 F.2d 964, 1941 U.S. App. LEXIS 3370 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 314 U.S. 667, 62 S. Ct. 129, 86 L. Ed. 534, 1941 U.S. LEXIS 241 (U.S. 1941).

Suit against state. —

Nebraska irrigation district action to restrain Wyoming water officials from unlawfully permitting junior appropriators to take water and to compel distribution in proper order is not suit against state. Mitchell Irr. Dist. v. Sharp, 121 F.2d 964, 1941 U.S. App. LEXIS 3370 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 314 U.S. 667, 62 S. Ct. 129, 86 L. Ed. 534, 1941 U.S. LEXIS 241 (U.S. 1941).

Stated

in

In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 753 P.2d 76,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Experience With Federal Non-Indian Reserved Rights: The Big Horn Adjudication,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 433 (1986).

For article, “Aldo Leopold and Western Water Law: Thinking Perpendicular to the Prior Appropriation Doctrine,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1989).

§ 41-3-502.
Superintendents; appointment; removal; number; qualifications; examination.

There shall be one (1) superintendent for each division, who shall be appointed by the governor and who shall be a resident of the water division for which he is appointed. The governor may remove any superintendent as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The state engineer shall from time to time conduct examinations for candidates for the position of division superintendents, and a list of those who qualify shall be filed with the governor and the governor, from that list, shall appoint division superintendents for the various divisions as vacancies occur. No candidate is eligible for appointment as division superintendent unless he is qualified by training and experience. The examination shall consist of questions relative to the irrigation laws and their administration, the measurement of flowing water, evaporation, seepage, drainage and the hydrographic features of the water division in which the candidate seeks appointment.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 13; R.S. 1899, § 849; Laws 1907, ch. 86, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 754; C.S. 1920, § 875; Laws 1925, ch. 166, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-202; Laws 1941, ch. 118, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-102; W.S. 1957, § 41-55; Laws 1963, ch. 125, § 1; 1971, ch. 190, § 20; 1987, ch. 175, § 1.

Duties are executive. —

Duties and powers of water commissioners and superintendents of water divisions, in respect to division of water among appropriators according to their prior rights, are executive and not judicial, though sometimes a limited judicial discretion may be necessary. Ryan v. Tutty, 13 Wyo. 122, 78 P. 661,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1904).

Removal of officers. —

A state superintendent of a water district is a state officer who may be removed by the governor, as the impeachment provisions of the constitution do not apply. State ex rel. Hamilton v. Grant, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1905).

§ 41-3-503.
Superintendents; duties generally.

Said division superintendent shall have general control over the water commissioners of the several districts within his division. He shall, under the general supervision of the state engineer, execute the laws relative to the distribution of water in accordance with the rights of priority of appropriation, and perform such other functions as may be assigned to him by the state engineer. It shall be the duty of said division superintendent to regulate and control the storage and use of water under all rights of appropriation which have been adjudicated by the board of control or by the courts, and to regulate and control the storage and use of water under all permits approved by the state engineer, whether the rights acquired thereunder have been adjudicated or not.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 14; R.S. 1899, § 850; C.S. 1910, § 755; Laws 1917, ch. 36, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 876; R.S. 1931, § 122-203; C.S. 1945, § 71-103; W.S. 1957, § 41-57.

Adjudications. —

A decision of a commissioner and superintendent as to right to use of water, though not appealed from, is not an adjudication conclusive on the courts. Ryan v. Tutty, 13 Wyo. 122, 78 P. 661,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1904).

Adjudications by the board were prima facie correct, though not binding on persons not parties to the proceedings. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Presumptions by appropriator. —

Appropriator may presume not only that appropriators above him are taking only amount of water to which they are entitled, but also that officials who regulate and distribute waters of the state are doing their duty. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Hamilton v. Grant, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1905); In re The General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River System and All Other Sources, State of Wyoming, 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).

§ 41-3-504.
Superintendents; powers generally.

Said division superintendent shall have authority to order, in writing, the construction of suitable ditches to carry the return waters from any ditch or lands to the main stream or proper waste way; he shall have the authority, and it shall be his duty, to close or cause to be closed the headgate of any person, persons or corporation so ordered, until such time as said order is complied with; he shall have authority to instruct the water commissioners in his division to brand, number or mark the headgate of any and all canals, ditches, laterals and reservoir outlets in such manner that the owner or owners of said canals, ditches, laterals or reservoir outlets may be readily determined; he shall, in the distribution of water, be governed by the provisions of law relating to water rights, but for the better discharge of his duties, he shall have authority to make such other regulations to secure the equal and fair distribution of water in accordance with the rights of priority of appropriation as may, in his judgment, be needed in his division; provided, such regulations shall not be in violation of the laws of the state, but shall be merely supplementary to and necessary to enforce the provisions of the general laws and amendments thereto.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 15; R.S. 1899, § 851; Laws 1909, ch. 61, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 756; Laws 1915, ch. 70, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 877; R.S. 1931, § 122-204; C.S. 1945, § 71-104; W.S. 1957, § 41-58.

Duties are executive. —

Duties and powers of water commissioners and superintendents of water divisions, in respect to division of water among appropriators according to their prior rights, are executive and not judicial, though sometimes a limited judicial discretion may be necessary. Ryan v. Tutty, 13 Wyo. 122, 78 P. 661,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1904).

§ 41-3-505.
Superintendents; compensation and traveling expenses; full time devoted to duties.

Each division superintendent of a water division shall receive an annual salary as determined by the human resources division of the department of administration and information, payable in monthly installments in full compensation for all his services, and shall, in addition thereto, be paid his actual traveling expenses when called away from home in the performance of his duties. Such superintendents shall devote their full time to the performance of their duties as division water superintendents. Their salaries and expenses shall be paid by the state on vouchers approved by the state engineer as president of the state board of control.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 59, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 855; Laws 1903, ch. 41, § 1; 1907, ch. 49, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 759; C.S. 1920, § 880; Laws 1921, ch. 95, § 28; R.S. 1931, § 122-207; Laws 1933, ch. 103, § 8; 1945, ch. 142, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-107; Laws 1953, ch. 139, § 32; 1957, ch. 157, § 39; W.S. 1957, § 41-59; Laws 1963, ch. 125, § 2; 1969, ch. 168, § 38; 1971, ch. 190, § 19; 1997, ch. 178, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to salaries and fees of public officers, see Wyo. Const. art. 14, §§ 1 and 2.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1899, ch. 59, § 3, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

§ 41-3-506.
Superintendents; appeal from order or regulations.

Any person, ditch company, or ditch owner, who may deem himself injured or discriminated against by any such order or regulations of such division superintendent, shall have the right to appeal from the same to the state engineer, by filing with the state engineer a copy of the order or regulations complained of, and a statement of the manner in which the same injuriously affects the petitioner’s interest. The state engineer shall, after due notice, hear whatever testimony may be brought forward by the petitioner, either orally or by affidavit and, through the division superintendent, shall have power to suspend, amend or confirm the order complained of.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 16; R.S. 1899, § 852; C.S. 1910, § 757; C.S. 1920, § 878; R.S. 1931, § 122-205; C.S. 1945, § 71-105; W.S. 1957, § 41-60.